Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.080

State seal.

The seal of the state of Washington shall be, a seal encircled with the words: "The Seal of the State of Washington," with the vignette of General George Washington as the central figure, and beneath the vignette the figures "1889" and shall be composed as appears in the illustration below:

[ 1967 ex.s. c 65 s 1.]